Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1553
Training for supervisors and employees; requirements.

(1) Except for insurance producers described in subdivision (7)(a) of section 44-1548, an insurer shall provide training to all supervisors and employees of such insurer appropriate to the job responsibilities of supervisors and employees handling or advising on complaints, possible fraud, and investigations. Such training shall be completed by the later of April 15, 2027, or one year after the date any supervisor or employee begins employment with or becomes affiliated or associated with the insurer. The training shall include all of the following:

(a) Instruction on how to identify the suspected or attempted exploitation of an eligible adult, including identifying common signs indicating the financial exploitation of an eligible adult, and how to provide notification regarding the suspected or attempted exploitation of an eligible adult; and

(b) Instruction regarding privacy and confidentiality requirements.

(2) An insurer shall provide the training required by this section as soon as reasonably practicable.

(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an insurer shall be deemed to be in compliance with this section if such insurer provides antifraud training to all supervisors and employees of such insurer pursuant to the laws or regulations of this state or another state and if such training includes instruction substantially similar to the instruction described in subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 23.
July 18, 2026